District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.19

Filing by rating bureaus.

(a)

A title insurer may satisfy its obligation to file premium rates, rating manuals, and forms as required by this chapter if:

(1)

It becomes a member of, or a subscriber to, a rate service organization, organized and licensed under the provisions of acts relating to insurance which are codified in this title;

(2)

The rate service organization makes the filings; and

(3)

It authorizes the Commissioner in writing to accept the filings on the title insurer’s behalf.

(b)

This chapter shall not:

(1)

Require any title insurer to become a member of, or a subscriber to, any rate service organization; and

(2)

Prohibit the filing of deviations from rate service organization filings by any member or subscriber.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2160, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2160 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).